Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2931
Refunding or advance refunding obligation; authorized; limitation.

The investment program may issue any refunding or advance refunding obligation to retire outstanding debt, reduce debt service, restructure any maturity, or achieve savings. Any such refunding shall not extend any final maturity beyond the useful life of the financed asset.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 31.
July 18, 2026